el: Επίπεδο περιεκτικότητας σε ζάχαρη: Χαμηλή περιεκτικότητα σε ζάχαρη; Χωρίς προσθήκη ζάχαρης; Μειωμένη ζάχαρη; Κανονικό; Χωρίς ζάχαρη; Άλλο
hr-HR: Razina sadržaja šećera: S malo šećera; Bez dodanog šećera; Smanjenog udjela šećera; Standardno; Bez šećera; Ostalo
sk-SK: Obsah cukru: Nízky obsah cukru; Bez pridaného cukru; Znížený obsah cukru; Bežné množstvo; Bez cukru; Iné
hu: Cukortartalom: Alacsony cukortartalmú; Hozzáadott cukor nélkül; Csökkentett cukortartalmú; Normál; Cukormentes; Egyéb
tr: Şeker içeriği seviyesi: Düşük şekerli; İlave şekersiz; Şekeri azaltılmış; Normal; Şekersiz; Diğer
da: Sukkerindholdsniveau: Lavt sukkerindhold; Ikke tilsat sukker; Reduceret sukkerindhold; Almindelig; Sukkerfri; Andet
fr: Teneur en sucre: Faible en sucre; Sans sucre ajouté; Allégé en sucre; Classique; Sans sucre; Autre
sv: Sockernivå: Låg sockerhalt; Inget tillsatt socker; Reducerad sockerhalt; Standard; Sockerfri; Övrigt
ru: Уровень содержания сахара: Низкое содержание сахара; Без добавления сахара; Пониженное содержание сахара; Обычное; Без сахара; Другое
ro-RO: Nivelul conținutului de zahăr: Sărac în zahăr; Fără zahăr adăugat; Conținut redus de zahăr; Normal; Fără zahăr; Altele
zh-TW: 含糖量等級: 低糖; 無添加糖; 減糖; 正常糖; 無糖; 其他
es: Nivel de contenido de azúcar: Bajo en azúcar; Sin azúcares añadidos; Azúcar reducido; Regular; Sin azúcar; Otro
lt-LT: Cukraus kiekio lygis: Mažai cukraus; Be pridėtinio cukraus; Sumažintas cukraus kiekis; Įprastas; Be cukraus; Kitas
bg-BG: Ниво на съдържание на захар: Ниско съдържание на захар; Без добавена захар; Намалено съдържание на захар; Обикновено; Без захар; Друго
nb: Innholdsnivå av sukker: Lite sukker; Uten tilsatt sukker; Redusert sukkerinnhold; Vanlig; Sukkerfri; Annet
pt-PT: Teor de açúcar: Baixo teor de açúcar; Sem adição de açúcar; Açúcar reduzido; Normal; Sem açúcar; Outro
it: Livello di zucchero minimo: Basso contenuto di zuccheri; Senza zuccheri aggiunti; Ridotto contenuto di zuccheri; Normale; Senza zucchero; Altro
pt-BR: Teor de açúcar nível: Baixo teor de açúcar; Sem adição de açúcar; Com redução de açúcar; Normal; Sem açúcar; Outros
cs: Úroveň obsahu cukru: Nízký obsah cukru; Bez přidaného cukru; Snížený obsah cukru; Běžný; Bez cukru; Jiné
pl: Poziom zawartości cukru: Niska zawartość cukru; Bez dodatku cukru; Obniżona zawartość cukru; Normalna; Bez cukru; Inna
ja: 糖分含有量レベル: 低糖; 砂糖不使用; 糖分控えめ; レギュラー; 無糖; その他
sl-SI: Stopnja vsebnosti sladkorja: Malo sladkorja; Brez dodanega sladkorja; Zmanjšan delež sladkorja; Običajno; Brez sladkorja; Drugo
zh-CN: 含糖量等级: 低糖; 无添加糖; 减糖; 常规; 无糖; 其他
de: Zuckergehaltsstufe: Zuckerarm; Ohne Zuckerzusatz; Zuckerreduziert; Normal; Zuckerfrei; Sonstige
th: ระดับปริมาณน้ำตาล: น้ำตาลน้อย; ไม่เติมน้ำตาล; ลดน้ำตาล; สูตรปกติ; ปราศจากน้ำตาล; อื่นๆ
vi: Mức độ đường: Ít đường; Không thêm đường; Giảm đường; Thông thường; Không đường; Khác
fi: Sokeripitoisuustaso: Vähäsokerinen; Ei lisättyä sokeria; Vähennetty sokeria; Tavallinen; Sokeriton; Muu
nl: Suikergehalte niveau: Weinig suiker; Geen toegevoegde suikers; Minder suiker; Regulier; Suikervrij; Overig
ko: 당 함량 수준: 저당; 무가당; 당류 저감; 일반; 무설탕; 기타
en: Sugar content level: Low sugar; No added sugar; Reduced sugar; Regular; Sugar-free; Other